California statutes. Water Code
(d) In the case of facilities proposed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 13400, the facilities will produce recycled water and the applicant has adopted a feasible program for the use of the facilities. The state board may adopt criteria for ranking and setting priorities among applicants for those guarantees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 673, Sec. 34.   (AB 1531)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13427.

No guarantee shall be extended to any applicant unless it executes an agreement with the state board under which the applicant agrees to the following provisions:

(a) To proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the proposed project.

(b) To commence operation of the project on completion, and to properly operate and maintain the work in accordance with applicable provisions of law.

(c) To issue bonds and to levy fines, charges, assessments, or taxes to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as described in the application.

(d) To diligently and expeditiously collect those levies, including timely exercise of available legal remedies in the event of delinquency or default.

(e) To act in accordance with such other provisions as the state board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   Effective March 18, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

13428.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the Clean Water Bond Guarantee Fund, which is hereby created, is continuously appropriated to the state board without regard to fiscal years for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   Effective March 18, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

13429.

Money in the Clean Water Bond Guarantee Fund not needed for making payments on guaranteed bonds pursuant to this chapter shall be invested pursuant to law. All proceeds of the investment shall be deposited in that fund to the extent permitted by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   Effective March 18, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

13430.

The state board’s authorization to guarantee bonds under this article shall be limited to bonds with a total principal amount of not more than 10 times the amount in the Clean Water Bond Guarantee Fund at the time the state board determines to extend each guarantee pursuant to Section 13426.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   Effective March 18, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

13431.

Under no circumstances shall the amount paid out as a result of bond guarantees extended pursuant to this article exceed the amount in the Clean Water Bond Guarantee Fund. This article does not express or imply any commitment by the state board or any other agency of the state to pay any money or levy any charge or tax or otherwise exercise its faith and credit on behalf of any local agency or bondholder beyond the funds in the Clean Water Bond Guarantee Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   Effective March 18, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

13432.

The state board may charge an annual fee not to exceed one-tenth of 1 percent of the principal amount of each bond issue that it guarantees for guarantee coverage. The state board may charge a lesser amount. The proceeds of any fee shall be paid into the Clean Water Bond Guarantee Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   Effective March 18, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

13433.

The state board shall, by regulation, prescribe rules and procedures for all of the following:

(a) To pay money from the Clean Water Bond Guarantee Fund to an insured local agency or bondholder in the event that the amount in the local agency’s bond reserve fund falls below a minimum amount, or in the event of failure by the local agency to pay the principal of, or interest on, an insured bond issue on time, as the state board may require.

(b) To require, by court action if necessary, a local agency to raise sewer service charges, levy additional assessments, collect charges or assessments, or foreclose or otherwise sell property as needed to prevent a reduction in the local agency’s bond reserve fund, or to prevent default, or to collect funds to repay to the fund any payments made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   Effective March 18, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. State Water Pollution Cleanup and Abatement Account [13440. - 13444.]

13440.

There is in the State Water Quality Control Fund the State Water Pollution Cleanup and Abatement Account (hereinafter called the “account”), to be administered by the state board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13441.

(a) There is to be paid into the account all moneys from the following sources:

(1) All moneys appropriated by the Legislature for the account.

(2) All moneys contributed to the account by any person and accepted by the state board.

(3) Except as otherwise provided, one-half of all moneys collected by way of criminal penalty and all moneys collected civilly under any proceeding brought pursuant to any provision of this division.

(4) All moneys collected by the state board or a regional board for the account under Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 25280) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) All moneys collected by the state board for the account under Section 13304 or for the account under other law allowing recovery of costs for cleanup or abatement of waste, pollution, or contamination.

(6) Repayment of principal, interest, and fees on loans issued pursuant to this article.

(7) Repayments of loan and grant moneys paid to a loan or grant recipient pursuant to this article in which the recipient was not eligible for that loan or grant.

(8) Notwithstanding Sections 16305.7 and 16475 of the Government Code, any interest earned upon moneys deposited into the account.

(b) The first unencumbered five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) paid into the account in any given fiscal year is available without regard to fiscal years, for expenditure by the state board in accordance with the provisions of this
 article. The next unencumbered five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), or any portion thereof, deposited in any given fiscal year, is available for expenditure by the state board for the purposes of this article, subject to the provisions set forth in Section 28 of the Budget Act of 1984 (Chapter 258 of the Statutes of 1984). The next unencumbered one million dollars ($1,000,000) deposited in the account in any given fiscal year is available for expenditure by the state board for the purposes of Section 13443. The remaining unencumbered funds deposited in the account in any given fiscal year is available without regard to fiscal years to the state board for expenditure for the purposes set forth in Sections 13442 and 13442.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 339)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13441.5.

The State Treasurer, when requested by the state board and approved by the Director of Finance, shall transfer moneys in the nature of a loan from the State Water Quality Control Fund to the account created pursuant to Section 13440, which shall be repayable from the account to such fund; provided, that the moneys transferred from the fund to the account shall not exceed the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

13442.

(a) Upon application by an eligible entity, as described in subdivision (b), the state board may approve the payment of grant moneys from the account to that entity to assist in cleaning up a waste, abating the effects of a waste on waters of the state, addressing actions required pursuant to Section 13289.5, or addressing an urgent drinking water need without regard to whether the need for drinking water is a result of the discharge of waste.

(b) An entity is eligible to apply for funding pursuant to this section if that entity has authority to undertake the activity described in subdivision (a) for which it seeks moneys and the entity is any of the following:

(1) A public agency.

(2) A tribal government that is on the California Tribal Consultation List maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission and is a disadvantaged community, as defined in Section 79505.5, that agrees to waive tribal sovereign immunity for the explicit purpose of regulation by the state board pursuant to this division.

(3) A not-for-profit organization serving a disadvantaged community, as defined in Section 79505.5.

(4) A community water system, as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code, that serves a disadvantaged community, as defined in Section 79505.5.

(5) An administrator, as defined in Section 13288.

(c) An eligible entity shall not become liable to the state board for repayment of moneys paid to the entity under this section and expended in accordance with the state board’s approval of payment, but this shall not be a defense to an action brought pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13304 for the recovery of moneys paid under this section.

(d) Projects using moneys that are paid to an eligible entity pursuant to this section shall be exempt from state contracting and procurement requirements set forth in the Government Code and the Public Contract Code to the extent necessary to take immediate action to protect public health and safety.

(e) The state
 board may adopt guidelines for the allocation and administration of these moneys that shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(f) The state board may expend funds for the purposes described in Section 13289.5, but is not authorized to use funds for these purposes for costs incurred after December 31, 2029.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 505, Sec. 4.   (AB 805)   Effective September 24, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13442.5.

(a) Upon application by an eligible entity, as described in subdivision (b), the state board may make funds available from the account for a loan to that entity to assist in cleaning up a waste, abating the effects of a waste on waters of the state, or addressing an urgent drinking water need without regard to whether the need for drinking water is a result of the discharge of waste.

(b) An entity is eligible to apply for a loan pursuant to this section if that entity has authority to undertake the activity described in subdivision (a) for which it seeks moneys and the entity is any of the following:

(1) A public agency.

(2) A nonprofit organization.

(3) A community water system, as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Loan applicants shall demonstrate all of the following:

(1) The ability to repay the loan.

(2) The availability of adequate collateral to secure the loan.

(3) That the loaned funds will be used for purposes consistent with subdivision (a).

(4) Other information that the state board determines to be necessary.

(d) Any loan issued pursuant to this section shall be secured by adequate collateral. The term of the loan shall not
 exceed 10 years. The interest rate for the loan shall be set by the state board in guidelines adopted pursuant to subdivision (f).

(e) Projects using moneys that are loaned pursuant to this section shall not be subject to state contracting and procurement requirements to the extent necessary to take immediate action to protect public health and safety. 

(f) The state board shall adopt guidelines for the allocation and administration of loans from the account. These guidelines shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(g) The state board may expend funds from the account to service loans, recover defaulted loan moneys, and protect the state’s position as a lender creditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 439, Sec. 4.   (AB 339)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13443.

Upon application by a regional board that is attempting to remedy a significant unforeseen water pollution problem, posing an actual or potential public health threat, or is overseeing and tracking the implementation of a supplemental environmental project required as a condition of an order imposing administrative civil liability, and for which the regional board does not have adequate resources budgeted, the state board may order moneys to be paid from the account to the regional board to assist it in responding to the problem.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 869, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

13444.

(a) No later than January 1 of each year, the board shall post on its internet website a report describing the receipts and expenditures of the State Water Pollution Cleanup and Abatement Account for the most recent completed fiscal year.

(b) The board shall complete the initial report no later than January 1, 2026, and that report shall
 include, but not be limited to, the data required pursuant to subdivision (c) for the period from July 1, 2017, to June 30, 2025, inclusive.

(c) Each report completed pursuant to this section shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A list of applications that, for each application, contains the following:

(A) The amount of funds the application requested.

(B) The board’s decision on the application.

(C) The amount of funds granted to the applicant.

(D) A description of the project funded, if applicable.

(E) If the application was denied in whole or in part, the reasons for the denial or partial funding.

(2) (A) The total and individual amount of deposits to the State Water Pollution Cleanup and Abatement Account originating from enforcement fines.

(B) The
 total amount of funds diverted to supplemental environmental projects
 from enforcement fines that would otherwise be deposited into the State Water Pollution Cleanup and Abatement Account.

(3) The total amount of deposits to the account originating from
 each regional board and the total amount of grants provided to projects within each region.

(d) Commencing no later than June 30, 2025, the board shall separately account within the State Water Pollution Cleanup and Abatement Account all categories of receipts, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following categories:

(1) Enforcement fines.

(2) Cost recovery in accordance with Section 13365.

(3) Judicially approved settlements or judicial orders that include specified limitations on the use of the funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 957, Sec. 1.   (AB 2318)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.1. Water Conservation and Water Quality Bond Law of 1986 [13450. - 13469.]

13450.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Water Conservation and Water Quality Bond Law of 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 44 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13451.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) An abundant supply of clean water is essential to the public health, safety, and welfare.

(b) An abundant supply of clean water fosters the beauty of California’s environment, the expansion of industry and agriculture, maintains fish and wildlife, and supports recreation.

(c) The state’s growing population has increasing needs for clean water supplies and adequate treatment facilities.

(d) It is of paramount importance that the water resources of the state be protected from pollution and conserved, and that the groundwater basins of the state be recharged whenever possible to ensure continued economic, community, and social growth.

(e) The chief cause of water pollution is the discharge of inadequately treated waste into the waters of the state.

(f) Local agencies have the primary responsibility for the construction, operation, and maintenance of facilities to cleanse our waters, to conserve water, and recharge groundwater basins.

(g) Rising costs of construction have pushed the costs of constructing treatment facilities and facilities to conserve water and recharge groundwater basins beyond the ability of local agencies to pay.

(h) Because water knows no political boundaries, it is desirable for the state to contribute to the construction of these facilities in order to meet its obligations to protect and promote the health, safety, and welfare of its people and the environment.

(i) Voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs can help meet growing demand for clean and abundant water supplies.

(j) Recharge of groundwater basins is an effective way to maximize availability of scarce water supplies throughout the state.

(k) California’s abundant streams, rivers, bays, estuaries, and groundwater are threatened with pollution from agricultural drainage water which could threaten public health and fish and wildlife resources and impede economic and social growth if left unchecked. Proper containment structures and treatment facilities could provide for the handling of agricultural drainage water in an environmentally sensitive manner.

(l) (1) It is the intent of this chapter to provide funds for the construction of cost-effective containment structures and treatment facilities for the treatment, storage and disposal of agricultural drainage water.

(2) It is the further intent of this chapter to provide funds for voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs and groundwater recharge facilities cooperatively carried out by local agencies and the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 44 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13452.

As used in this chapter, and for purposes of this chapter, as used in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the following words have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(b) “Committee” means the Water Conservation and Water Quality Finance Committee created by Section 13454.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(d) “Drainage water management units” mean land and facilities for the treatment, storage, or disposal of agricultural drainage water which, if discharged untreated, would pollute or threaten to pollute the waters of the state.

(1) Drainage water management units may include any of the following:

(A) A surface impoundment which is a natural topographic depression, artificial excavation, or diked area formed primarily of earthen materials, which is designed to hold an accumulation of drainage water, including, but not limited to, holding, storage, settling, and aeration pits, evaporation ponds, percolation ponds, other ponds, and lagoons. Surface impoundment does not include a landfill, a land farm, a pile, an emergency containment dike, tank, or injection well.

(B) Conveyance facilities to the treatment or storage site, including devices for flow regulation.

(C) Facilities or works to treat agricultural drainage water to remove or substantially reduce the level of constituents which pollute or threaten to pollute the waters of the state, including, but not limited to, processes utilizing ion exchange, desalting technologies like reverse osmosis, and biological treatment. 

(D) An injection well.

(2) Any or all of the drain water management units, including the land under the unit, may consist of separable features, or an appropriate share of multipurpose features, of a larger system, or both.

(e) “Fund” means the 1986 Water Conservation and Water Quality Bond Fund.

(f) “Groundwater recharge facilities” mean land and facilities for artificial groundwater recharge through methods which include, but are not limited to, (1) percolation using basins, pits, ditches and furrows, modified streambed, flooding, and well injection or (2) in-lieu recharge. “Groundwater recharge facilities” also mean capital outlay expenditures to expand, renovate, or restructure land and facilities already in use for the purpose of groundwater recharge.

Groundwater recharge facilities may include any of the following:

(1) Instream facilities for regulation of water levels, but not regulation of streamflow by storage to accomplish diversion from the waterway.

(2) Agency-owned facilities for extraction.

(3) Conveyance facilities to the recharge site, including devices for flow regulation and measurement of recharge waters.

Any part or all of the project facilities, including the land under the facilities, may consist of the separable features, or an appropriate share of multipurpose features, of a larger system, or both.

(g) “In-lieu recharge” means accomplishing increased storage of groundwater by providing interruptible surface water to a user who relies on groundwater as a primary supply, to accomplish groundwater storage through the direct use of that surface water in lieu of pumping groundwater. In-lieu recharge would be used rather than continuing pumping while artificially recharging with the interruptible surface waters. However, bond proceeds shall not be used to purchase surface water for use in lieu of pumping groundwater.

(h) “Local agency” or “agency” means any city, county, district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision of the state involved with water management.

(i) “Project” means all of the following:

(1) Groundwater recharge facilities.

(2) Voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs.

(3) Drainage water management units.

(j) “Voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs” mean those feasible capital outlay measures to improve the efficiency of water use through benefits which exceed their costs. The programs include, but are not limited to, lining or piping of ditches; improvements in water distribution system controls such as automated canal control, construction of small reservoirs within distribution systems which conserve water that has already been captured for use, and related physical improvements; tailwater pumpback recovery systems; major improvements or replacements of distribution systems to reduce leakage; and capital changes in on-farm irrigation systems which improve irrigation efficiency such as sprinkler or subsurface drip. In each case, the department shall determine that there is a net savings of water as a result of each proposed project and that the project is cost effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 44 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13453.

There is hereby created the 1986 Water Conservation and Water Quality Bond Fund in the State Treasury. There shall be established in the fund a Water Conservation and Groundwater Recharge Account for the purpose of implementing Section 13458, and an Agricultural Drainage Water Account for the purpose of implementing Section 13459.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 44 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13454.

(a) There is a Water Conservation and Water Quality Finance Committee consisting of the Governor or the Governor’s designated representative, the Controller, the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, the Director of the Department of Water Resources, and the Executive Director of the State Water Resources Control Board.

(b) The Water Conservation and Water Quality Finance Committee is the “committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 44 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13455.

(a) The committee may create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California in the aggregate amount of one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000), in the manner provided in this chapter. The debt or debts, liability or liabilities, shall be created for the purpose of providing the fund to be used for the object and work specified in this section and in Sections 13458 and 13459.

(b) The department may enter into contracts and may adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of Section 13458.

(c) The department may expend not more than 212 percent of the total amount of the bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter for the administration of Section 13458.

(d) The board may enter into contracts and may adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of Section 13459.

(e) The board may expend not more than 212 percent of the total amount of the bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter for the administration of Section 13459.

(f) The department or the board may expend funds necessary to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 44 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13456.

All bonds which have been duly sold and delivered constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner, and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, the amount, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of that revenue to perform each and every act which is necessary to collect this additional amount.

All money deposited in the fund which has been derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold is available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 44 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13457.

The State General Obligation Bond Law is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and other matters with respect to, the bonds authorized by this chapter. The provisions of that law are included in this chapter as though set out in full in this chapter, except that, notwithstanding any provision in the State General Obligation Bond Law, the bonds authorized under this chapter shall bear the rates of interest, or maximum rates, fixed from time to time by the Treasurer with the approval of the committee. The maximum maturity of the bonds shall not exceed 50 years from the date of the bonds or from the date of each respective series. The maturity of each respective series shall be calculated from the date of the series.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 44 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13458.

(a) The sum of seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) of the money in the fund shall be deposited in the Water Conservation and Groundwater Recharge Account and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, is appropriated for expenditure in the 1986–87 fiscal year for loans to local agencies to aid in the acquisition and construction of voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs and groundwater recharge facilities and the purposes set forth in this section. Loans made in the 1986–87 fiscal year may not be authorized sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the chairperson of the committee in each house which considers appropriations, to the policy committee of the Assembly as designated by the Speaker of the Assembly and the policy committee of the Senate designated by the Senate Rules Committee, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(b) Any contract entered into pursuant to this section may include provisions as may be determined by the department. However, any contract concerning an eligible, voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation program shall be supported by or shall include, in substance, all of the following:

(1) An estimate of the reasonable cost and benefit of the program.

(2) An agreement by the local agency to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the program.

(3) A provision that there shall be no moratorium or deferment on payments of principal or interest.

(4) A loan period of up to 20 years with an interest rate set annually by the department at 50 percent of the interest rate computed by the true interest cost method on bonds most recently issued pursuant to this chapter. The interest rate set for each contract shall be applied throughout the contract’s repayment period. There shall be a level annual repayment of principal and interest on the loans.

(5) A provision that the project shall not receive any more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in loan proceeds from the department.

The department shall set priority for loans under this subdivision on the basis of the cost effectiveness of the proposed project, with the most cost-effective projects receiving the highest priorities.

(c) Any contract concerning an eligible project for groundwater recharge shall be supported by or shall include, in substance, all of the following:

(1) A finding by the department that the agency has the ability to repay the requested loan, that the project is economically justified, and that the project is feasible from an engineering and hydrogeologic viewpoint.

(2) An estimate of the reasonable cost and benefit of the project, including a feasibility report which shall set forth the economic justification and the engineering, hydrogeologic, and financial feasibility of the project, and shall include explanations of the proposed facilities and their relation to other water-related facilities in the basin or region.

(3) An agreement by the agency to proceed expeditiously to complete the project in conformance with the approved plans and specifications and the feasibility report and to operate and maintain the project properly upon completion throughout the repayment period.

(4) A provision that there shall be no moratorium or deferment on payment of principal or interest.

(5) A loan period of up to 20 years with an interest rate set annually by the department at 50 percent of the interest rate computed by the true interest cost method on bonds most recently issued pursuant to this chapter. The interest rate set for each contract shall be applied throughout the contract’s repayment period. There shall be a level annual repayment of principal and interest on the loans.

(6) A provision that the project shall not receive any more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in loan proceeds from the department.

The department shall give priority under this subdivision to projects of agencies located in overdrafted groundwater basins and those projects of critical need, to projects whose feasibility studies show the greatest economic justification and the greatest engineering and hydrogeologic feasibility as determined by the department, and to projects located in areas which have existing water management programs.

(d) The department may make loans to local agencies, at the interest rates authorized under this section and under any terms and conditions as may be determined necessary by the department, for the purposes of financing feasibility studies of projects potentially eligible for funding under this section. No single potential project shall be eligible to receive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and not more than 3 percent of the total amount of bonds authorized to be expended for purposes of this section may be expended for this purpose. A loan for a feasibility study shall not decrease the maximum amount of any other loan which may be made under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 44 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13459.

(a) The sum of seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) of the money in the fund shall be deposited in the Agricultural Drainage Water Account is appropriated for expenditure in the 1986–87 fiscal year for loans to agencies to aid in the construction of drainage water management units for the treatment, storage, or disposal of agricultural drainage water and the purposes set forth in this section. The board may loan an agency up to 100 percent of the total eligible costs of design and construction of an eligible project. Loans made in the 1986–87 fiscal year may not be authorized sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the chairperson of the committee in each house which considers appropriations, to the policy committee of the Assembly as designated by the Speaker of the Assembly and the policy committee of the Senate designated by the Senate Rules Committee, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(b) Any contract for an eligible project entered into pursuant to this section may include such provisions as determined by the board and shall include, in substance, all of the following provisions:

(1) An estimate of the reasonable cost of the eligible project.

(2) An agreement by the agency to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the eligible project; commence operation of the containment structures or treatment works upon completion and to properly operate and maintain the works in accordance with applicable provisions of law; provide for payment of the agency’s share of the cost of the project, including principal and interest on any state loan made pursuant to this section; and, if appropriate, apply for and make reasonable efforts to secure federal assistance for the state-assisted project.

(c) All loans pursuant to this section are subject to all of the following provisions:

(1) Agencies seeking a loan shall demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the board, that an adequate opportunity for public participation regarding the loan has been provided.

(2) Any election held with respect to the loan shall include the entire agency except where the agency proposes to accept the loan on behalf of a specified portion, or portions, of the agency, in which case the referendum shall be held in that portion or portions of the agency only.

(3) Loan contracts may not provide a moratorium on payment of principal or interest.

(4) Loans shall be for a period of up to 20 years. The interest rate for the loans shall be set at a rate equal to 50 percent of the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, with that rate to be computed according to the true interest cost method. When the interest rate so determined is not a multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent, the interest rate shall be set at the next higher multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent. The interest rate set for each contract shall be applied throughout the contract’s repayment period. There shall be a level annual repayment of principal and interest on loans.

(5) The board in considering eligible projects shall give preference to technologies which treat drainage water where the board finds that the technology is readily available and economically feasible for the agency.

(6) No single project may receive more than twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in loan proceeds from the board.

(d) The board may make loans to local agencies, at the interest rates authorized under this section and under any terms and conditions as may be determined necessary by the board, for purposes of financing feasibility studies of projects potentially eligible for funding under this section. No single potential project shall be eligible to receive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and not more than 3 percent of the total amount of bonds authorized to be expended for purposes of this section may be expended for this purpose. A loan for a feasibility study shall not decrease the maximum amount of any other loan which may be made under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 3.   Amendment approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 6, and approved in Prop. 44 on June 3, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

13459.5.

Unallocated money remaining in the Agricultural Drainage Water Account in the 1986 Water Conservation and Water Quality Bond Fund on November 6, 1996, and any unallocated money deposited into that account from the sale of any bonds that are sold after November 6, 1996, shall be transferred to the Drainage Management Subaccount, created by Section 78641, of the Clean Water and Water Recycling Account in the Safe, Clean, Reliable Water Supply Fund for the purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 78645. For the purpose of this section, “unallocated money” means money not committed or appropriated as of November 6, 1996, which is not less than six million one hundred seventy-seven thousand dollars ($6,177,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 566, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1997.   This section was added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, and approved in Prop. 204 on Nov. 5, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13460.

Money deposited in the fund pursuant to any provision of law requiring repayments to the state for assistance financed by the proceeds of the bonds authorized by this chapter shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a reimbursement for payment of bond principal and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 44 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13461.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, for the purpose of this chapter, an amount equal to the sum of the following:

(a) The amount necessary annually to pay the principal of, and the interest on, the bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The amount necessary to carry out Section 13462, which is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 44 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13462.

For the purpose of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee has authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.
